Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 21 Bond Elections

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections § 1 et seq; 64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations §§ 130 to 162.

Inclusion of several structures or units as affecting validity of submission of proposition to voters at bond election, 4 ALR2d 617.

Validity of municipal bond issue as against owners of property, annexation of which to municipality became effective after date of election at which issue was approved by voters, 10 ALR2d 559.

Rescission of vote authorizing school district or other municipal bond issue, expenditure or tax, 68 ALR2d 1041.

Absentee Voters' Laws as applied to municipal bond elections, 97 ALR2d 257.

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for giving notice of bond issue election, which must be given a certain number of days before a known future date, 98 ALR2d 1331.